Utah statutes.
53A-20-106.   Power of board regarding expected federal aid to build schools.

For the purpose of participating in any program of assistance by the government of the United States designed to aid the various states, their political subdivisions and their educational agencies and institutions in providing adequate educational buildings and facilities, the State Board of Education, with the approval of the governor, may do the following:

(1)  It may develop and implement plans relating to the building of educational buildings for the use and benefit of school districts and educational institutions and agencies of the state.  These plans may conform to the requirements of federal legislation to such extent as the board finds necessary to qualify the state and its educational subdivisions, agencies, and institutions for federal educational building grants-in-aid.

(2)  It may enter into agreements on behalf of the state, its school districts, and its educational agencies and institutions with the federal government and its agencies, and with the school districts, educational agencies, and institutions of the state, as necessary to comply with federal legislation and to secure for them rights of participation as necessary to fulfill the educational building needs of the state.

(3)  It may accept, allocate, disburse, and otherwise deal with federal funds or other assets that are available for buildings from any federal legislation or program of assistance among the school districts, public educational agencies, and other public institutions eligible to participate in those programs.



Enacted by Chapter 2, 1988 General Session

